Idaho, session 2026, S1447.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Public Schools Educational Support
Program's Division of Student Support $5,000,000 from the Idaho High Needs
Student Fund for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027.
SECTION 2. Of the additional amounts appropriated in Section 1 of this
act for the Public Schools Educational Support Program's Division of Student
Support, $5,000,000 shall be considered expended from the Idaho High Needs
Student Fund for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027.
SECTION 3. CASH TRANSFER FROM THE IDAHO CAREER READY STUDENTS PROGRAM
FUND TO THE IDAHO HIGH NEEDS STUDENT FUND. There is hereby appropriated and
the Office of the State Controller shall transfer $1,000,000 from the Idaho
Career Ready Students Program Fund to the Idaho High Needs Student Fund as
soon as practicable for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027.
SECTION 4. CASH TRANSFER FROM THE DRIVER TRAINING ACCOUNT TO THE IDAHO
HIGH NEEDS STUDENT FUND. There is hereby appropriated and the Office of the
State Controller shall transfer $4,000,000 from the Driver Training Account
to the Idaho High Needs Student Fund as soon as practicable for the period
July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027.
SECTION 5. CONDITIONS, LIMITATIONS, AND RESTRICTIONS. Appropriations
made pursuant to this act are subject to the conditions, limitations, and re-
strictions specified in this act.
SECTION 6. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.